DI-736

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIAU2-01

DTC B1183/22 Short in D Squib (2nd step) Circuit

(to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The D squib (2nd step)circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, the spiral cable and the steering wheel

pad.

It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.
DTC B1183/22 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the D squib (2nd step) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd ste
¢ Short in D squib (2nd step) circuit (to B+) ] g pad (D squib ( P))
. . * Spiral cable
*D squib (2nd step) malfunction )
B1183/22 . . * Airbag sensor assembly
« Spiral cable malfunction .
) . *Dash wire
¢ Airbag sensor assembly malfunction .
e Column wire
HINT:

DTC B1183/22 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag

(dual stage airbag).

WIRING DIAGRAM

See page DI-719.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-
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DI-737
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2 [ Check D squib (2nd step) circuit.

D Squib PREPARATION:
(2nd step) :| Airbag Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery and wait

{U B: gggla; :[D:[D:D :| Sensor atleastfor2seconds.

:| Assembly CHECK:
(@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
@

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+
of the black connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib

H21259
ABO0119
P H19245

(2nd step)) side between the airbag sensor assembly and

the steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step)).
OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Go to step 5.

H21229
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

(©)

DTC B1183/22

CG TC OK:

H21272
H19247 AB0119
H10600

H21156

HINT:

ON CHECK:
@ |8
conds.

PREPARATION:
gns(?:izp) ] _ (@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
_ Airbag (b) Using a service wire, connect D2+ and D2- of the black
{D 9332'[,}1' :m:m:] igsn:r?:bl connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step))
] y side between the airbag sensor assembly and the steer-
- ing wheel pad (D squib (2nd step)).

Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCB 1183/22is not output.

CodesotherthancodeB 1183/22 may be outputatthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check D squib (2nd step).

D Squib

(2nd step) ] Airbag
Spiral

HTH i1 T]] Sensor

— ] Assembly

ON

DTC B1183/22

H21267
AB0019

H10600 W02043 H21157

@

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step)) to
the spiral cable.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCB 1183/22is not output.

HINT:

CodesotherthancodeB 1183/22 may be outputatthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace steering wheel pad
(D squib (2nd step)).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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5 [Check spiral cable.
 Column Wire PREPARATION:
(szgglgp) 1. (@ Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
] 1 éggzgr (b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
Cable el :| Assembly te.ry, and wait at Iegst for 90 seconds.
x (c) Disconnect the spiral cable connector from the column
wire.
ON J (d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.
) CHECK:
(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+
of the black spiral cable connector on the steering wheel
- pad (D squib (2nd step)) side.
AB0119 OK
P H19245 H21230 P AN
Voltage: Below 1V
NG> Replace spiral cable.
OK

6 Check column wire.

_Column Wire Dash PREPARATION:
(szgglzp) Wwire [] A (@) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
Spiral Dﬂ] Irbag (b) Disconnect the negative () terminal cable from the bat-
{D D: Cable:ﬂ :l Sensor ]
:| Assembly tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the column wire connector from the dash
wire.
(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
D2+ (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+
of the column wire connector on the spiral cable side.
OK:
E§§§§§ = (_)Q// (+) H21251 Voltage: Below 1V
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o )

Repair or replace column wire.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM
7 Check dash wire.
_ Column Wire Dash CHECK:
(szgglgp) wire [ Airbag (@)  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
CD D: (S:pit;fﬂ:[l D:D Blzﬂj Sensor (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+
e :| Assembly of the dash wire connector on the column wire side.
{} OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

D2+

s NG> Repair or replace dash wire.
H16851 H21232

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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